Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-923
Notice to board of education; when; notice to military installation.

(1) In order to provide for orderly school planning and development, a city of the first class, city of the second class, or village considering the adoption or amendment of a zoning ordinance or approval of the platting or replatting of any development of real estate shall notify the board of education of each school district in which the real estate, or some part thereof, to be affected by such a proposal lies, of the next regular meeting of the planning commission at which such proposal is to be considered and shall submit a copy of the proposal to the board of education at least ten days prior to such meeting.

(2) When a city of the first class, city of the second class, or village is considering the adoption or amendment of a zoning ordinance or the approval of the platting or replatting of any development of real estate, such city or village shall notify any military installation which is located within the corporate boundary limits or the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of the city or village if the city or village has received a written request for such notification from the military installation. The city or village shall deliver the notification to the military installation at least ten days prior to the meeting of the planning commission at which the proposal is to be considered.

(3) Plats of subdivisions approved by the agent of a city or village designated pursuant to section 19-916 shall not be subject to the notice requirements in this section.

Laws 1963, c. 463, § 1, p. 1491;

Laws 1969, c. 722, § 1, p. 2752;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 79-4,151;

Laws 1983, LB 71, § 14;

Laws 2010, LB279, § 3;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 90.